South Dakota, session 2026, HB1143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 13-32-10 be AMENDED:
13-32-10. Terms used in §§ 13-32-11 to 13-32-13, inclusive, mean:
(1) "Medication," an inhaled bronchodilator, auto-injectable epinephrine, insulin, or
other diabetes medication;
(2) "Parent," any person standing in parental relation;
(3) "Related equipment and supplies," medical equipment and supplies necessary for
a student's management and treatment of diabetes; and
(4) "School," any public or nonpublic school.
Section 2. That § 13-32-11 be AMENDED:
13-32-11. Any student may possess and self-administer prescription medication,
and possess and use related equipment and supplies, while on school property or at a
school-related event or activity only if:
(1) The student has been diagnosed with asthma, anaphylaxis, or diabetes, by a
licensed health care provider;
(2) The medication has been prescribed for that student as indicated by the
prescription label on the medication, or by a prescriber's school orders;
(3) The student's parent provides to the school:
(a) Written authorization, signed by the parent, for the student to self-
administer the prescription medication, and possess and use related
equipment and supplies, while on school property or at a school-related
event or activity; and

26.137.11 2 1143
(b) A written statement, signed by the parent, in which the parent releases the
school district or nonpublic school and its employees and agents from
liability for an injury arising from the student's self-administration of
prescription medication, or possession or use of related equipment and
supplies, while on school property or at a school-related event or activity,
unless in cases of wanton or willful misconduct;
(4) A written statement, signed by the student's physician or other licensed health care
provider, is provided to the school that states:
(a) The student has been diagnosed, by a licensed health care provider, with
asthma, anaphylaxis, or diabetes, and the student is capable of self-
administering and managing the prescription medication;
(b) The name and purpose of the medication;
(c) The prescribed dosage for the medication;
(d) The times at which or circumstances under which the medication may be
administered;
(e) The period for which the medication is prescribed; and
(f) The types of related equipment and supplies the student is permitted to
possess and use, if applicable.
The physician's or provider's statement must be retained in the student's
educational record maintained by the school.
HB1143 ENROLLED

26.137.11 3 1143
An Act to authorize the possession and self-administration of diabetes medications by a
student on school property and at school-related events and activities.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1143
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1143 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1143 ENROLLED